Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of  $100,000,000, for the purposes for which the Emergency Board lawfully
may allocate funds.
SECTION 2. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $300,000,000, to be allocated to state agencies  for state employee com-
pensation changes.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 3. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $75,000,000, to be allocated  to state agencies for compensation changes
driven by collective bargaining for workers who are not state employees.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 4. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $100,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon  Health Authority and the
Department of Human Services for caseload costs the agencies are unable to  mitigate during
the interim legislative periods.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 5. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the General
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 1
Fund, the amount of $150,000,000, to be allocated for the state’s natural disaster  prevention,
preparedness, response and recovery.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 6. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $24,000,000, to be allocated to the State  Forestry Department for fire
protection expenses.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 7. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $35,000,000, to be allocated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs  for
the state’s matching funds portion for construction of a veterans’ home in Roseburg,
Oregon, pursuant to ORS 408.385.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency  Board by section 500 (1), chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the state’s matching funds portion for construction of a
veterans’ home in Roseburg, Oregon, pursuant to ORS 408.385, is decreased by $35,000,000.
NOTE: Section 9 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 10. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $200,000, for distribution to the  Oregon State
University Foundation, for the Rural Mental Health Fund, for the expenses of the Oregon
State University Extension Service to operate the AgriStress Helpline in Oregon.
SECTION 11.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of the  State Fire Marshal, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $13,000,000, for deposit  in the Community Risk Re-
duction Fund established under ORS 476.396.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5538), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Department of the State Fire Marshal,
for the office of the State Fire Marshal, business services, emergency response, fire and  life
safety services and fire and  life safety education, is increased by $13,000,000, for the Com-
munity Risk Reduction Fund established under ORS 476.396.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1 (4), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, for market access, is
increased by $1,000,000, for  the wolf depredation compensation and financial assistance grant
program.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5009), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, for the Fish Division,
is increased by $1,400,000, for operations and research at the Rock Creek Hatchery.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 2
SECTION 15. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of State Lands, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $442,576, for the Common School Fund program, to  assist with
wetland mitigation and housing specific permits and support for local  government land use
permitting.
SECTION 16. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,500,000, for  deposit in the Universal
Representation Fund established under ORS 9.865.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (15),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill 5002), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for special governmental payments, is in-
creased by $10,500,000, for disbursement from the Universal Representation Fund established
under ORS 9.865 to Oregon Worker Relief, as the fiscal agent described in ORS 9.860.
SECTION 18. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $1,468,500, for distribution to the Oregon
Historical Society to be used for operational costs.
SECTION 19. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $229,000, for  distribution to Oregon
Public Broadcasting.
SECTION 20. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $750,000, for distribution to Pueblo Unido
PDX for facilitating the creation of additional language evaluations for  interpreters of
indigenous languages spoken in present-day Mexico and Central and South America.
SECTION 21.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $150,000, for  distribution to the Central
Oregon Intergovernmental Council  for the coordination and administrative support of soil
and water conservation districts and implementing ORS 568.970.
SECTION 22. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for  distribution to the Central
Oregon Intergovernmental Council for distribution to soil  and water conservation districts
for monitoring, or contracting for monitoring, and implementing ORS 568.970 and 568.972.
SECTION 23. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $2,000,000, for distribution to Oregon
Worker Relief to provide farmworker disaster relief.
SECTION 24. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, which may be expended to
provide the following grants pursuant to ORS 568.970, provided that the  grants are issued
within 60 days after the effective date of this 2025 Act:
(1) $1,235,000 for  providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Crook County.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 3
(2) $715,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Jefferson County.
(3) $585,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Klamath County.
(4) $585,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Deschutes County.
(5) $580,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Harney County.
(6) $455,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water  conservation district located in Lake
County.
(7) $455,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Wheeler County.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (1), chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2023, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Executive Division, is decreased by
$350,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Adult Trial Division, is decreased  by
$2,525,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (5), chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Juvenile Trial Division,  is decreased by
$200,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (6), chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Preauthorized Expenses, is increased by
$1,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 29.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Court Mandated Expenses,  is increased by
$4,200,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (8), chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Parent  Child Representation Program,
is decreased by $600,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (9), chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2023, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Administrative Services Division, is de-
creased by $1,525,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 32. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $4,500,000, for the purposes of implementing ORS 9.860 (4).
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 473, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the  State Marine Board, for administration and education, is
increased by $167,825, for boating safety education, enforcement and contracted services.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (2), chapter 473, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 4
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the State Marine Board, for marine law enforcement, is in-
creased by $2,067,759, for boating safety education, enforcement and contracted services.
SECTION 35.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (4),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5533), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  for capital debt service
and related costs, is increased by $1,872,675, for debt service.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5533), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5533), collected or  received
by the Oregon Military Department,  for operations, is increased by $195,000, for costs of bond
issuance.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of  State Police by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5029), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for Bond Debt Service,
is increased by $1,283,762, for debt service.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5029), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of State  Police, for the of-
fice of the Superintendent, Support Services and Criminal Justice  Info Services, is increased
by $121,814, for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon  Public Defense Commission by section 1 (12), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5031), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for capital debt  ser-
vice and related costs, is increased by $2,392,222, for debt service.
SECTION 40. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$145,219 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Oregon Public
Defense Commission, for the Administrative Services Division, for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$13,769,781 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Public
Defense Commission, for the Administrative Services Division, for a financial case manage-
ment system.
SECTION 42.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5012), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and including re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5012), collected
or received by the Judicial Department, for operations,  is increased by $35,000, for costs of
bond issuance.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,500,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 5
Fund established by section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws  2013, for the project costs for the
Morrow County Courthouse.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,500,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement
Fund established by section 64, chapter 723,  Oregon Laws 2013, for local matching funds for
the project costs for the Morrow County Courthouse.
SECTION 45.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled  Senate Bill 5520), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for water quality,
is increased by $999,684, for service delivery related to housing production.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and  woodstove grants and for smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services, but  excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the  Department of Environmental
Quality, for agency management, is increased by $810,780, for cybersecurity.
SECTION 47. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $7,000,000, for deposit  into the Landscape Resiliency Fund es-
tablished under ORS 477.502.
SECTION 48. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5521), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds from  the United States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5521), collected  or received by the State Forestry Depart-
ment, for forest resources, is increased by $7,000,000, for the Landscape  Resiliency Fund es-
tablished under ORS 477.502 for implementing ORS 477.503.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the State Parks and Recreation Department,
for direct services, is increased  by $73,123, for site interpretation about the Ruble House and
improvements.
SECTION 50.
Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $2,100
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
Medicare receipts and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security
Supplemental Security Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected or received
by the Department  of Human Services, for State assessments and enterprise-wide costs, for
debt service.
SECTION 51.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 472, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and including federal Older Americans Act  funds
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 6
received from the Department of Human Services, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in section 2, chapter 472, Oregon Laws 2023,  collected or received by the
Long Term Care Ombudsman, is increased  by $76,697, for grant funds from the Department
of Human Services.
SECTION 52.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon  Public Defense Commission by section 1 (10)(b), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5031), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for  the Ad-
ministrative Services Division, for the financial case management system,  is increased by
$370,000.
SECTION 53. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $1,250,000, for the Washington County  Courthouse Replacement
Planning Project.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (1)(a), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5038), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and the  Oregon War
Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Veterans’  Affairs, for operations, is increased by $61,000, for
costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$414,260 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs, for debt service.
SECTION 56. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $1,563,352, for debt service.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal
funds for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described in
section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502),  collected or received
by the State  Department of Agriculture, for administrative and support services, is increased
by $85,000, for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1 (1), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5502),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for administrative and
support services, is increased by $3,250,000, for Project OneODA.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$6,100,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
and including federal funds for  contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the State Department of Agri-
culture, for administrative and support services, for Project OneODA.
SECTION 60.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5009), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, for debt service, is
increased by $2,149,583.
SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 7
5009), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds from the Pacific  Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5009), collected or received by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the Adminis-
trative Services Division, is increased by $250,000, for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Land Conservation  and De-
velopment, is increased by $4,500,000, for the Collins Creek land acquisition project.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission by  section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5005), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, is  increased by
$1,200,000, for the Legal Services Pilot Program at the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department  of Corrections, for central
administration and administrative services, is increased by $655,000, for the  cost of bond is-
suance.
SECTION 65. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department  of Corrections, for central
administration and administrative services, is increased by $600,000,  for the Institution Staff
Deployment System Information Technology Project.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5004),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for debt service, is in-
creased by $1,683,797.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for operations and health
services, is increased by $2,000,000, for deferred maintenance.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for operations and health
services, is decreased by $882,496, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 69. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department  of Corrections, for oper-
ations and health services, is decreased by $2,530,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,412,496 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Corrections from American  Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 8
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Corrections, for  operations and
health services.
SECTION 71. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,331,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Corrections, for debt service.
SECTION 72. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Department of Justice, for the office
of the Attorney General and Administration, is increased by  $13,300,000, for the Legal Tools
Replacement Information Technology Project.
SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Department of Justice, for the office
of the Attorney General and Administration, is increased by $155,000,  for the cost of bond
issuance.
SECTION 74. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,558,869, for debt service and related costs.
SECTION 75. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled
House Bill 5014), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, for the office of the Attorney
General and Administration, is increased by $4,460,671, for the Legal Tools Replacement In-
formation Technology Project.
SECTION 76.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled
House Bill 5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the Crime Victim and  Survivor
Services Division, is increased by $400,000, for the Sexual Assault Examiner and  Sexual As-
sault Nurse Examiner Certification Commission.
SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the Civil
Enforcement Division, is decreased by $25,148,759, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 78. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$25,148,759 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Justice, for protection and education, for the purpose of carrying out ORS 180.095.
SECTION 79. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$8,191,890 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Justice, for protection and education, for civil enforcement  expansion and defense of state
interests.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 9
SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Oregon Department of Emergency Management by section 1 (1), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for
administration, is decreased by $1,400,084, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 81.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Department  of Emergency Manage-
ment, for administration, is decreased by $23,883, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 82. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected  or received by the Oregon Department of Emergency Manage-
ment, for Preparedness and Response, is increased by $23,883, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Oregon Department of Emergency Management by section 1 (2), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for
Preparedness and Response, is increased by $1,400,084, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 84.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Emergency
Management, for Preparedness and Response, is increased by $10,000,000, for  the State
Preparedness and Incident Response Equipment grant program.
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Emergency
Management, for Preparedness and Response, is increased  by $140,000, for the cost of bond
issuance.
SECTION 86. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Oregon Department of Emergency Management by section 1 (4), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for
debt service, is increased by $1,919,358.
SECTION 87.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$358,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Emergency Management, for debt service.
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5032), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Public  Safety Standards
and Training, for operations, is increased by $3,443,030, for a learning management system.
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5032), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 10
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Public Safety Standards
and Training, for operations, is increased by $105,910, for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Public Safety  Standards and Training by section 1 (1), chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5032), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, for
debt service, is increased by $1,172,155.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Public Safety Standards and  Training by section 1 (2), chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5032), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, for
facilities repairs, is increased by $500,000, for capital improvement.
SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5041), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Oregon Youth Authority, for program
support, is increased by  $12,141,046, for the Juvenile Justice Information System upgrade
project.
SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5041), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Oregon Youth Authority, for program
support, is increased by $153,954, for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5041), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Oregon Youth Authority, for facility
programs, is increased by $526,807, for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth  Authority by section 1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5041), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, for debt service, is increased
by $7,632,587.
SECTION 96. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (3), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5041), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, for program support, is in-
creased by $7,227,990, for the Juvenile Justice Information System upgrade project.
NOTE: Section 97 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 98. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5041), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Youth  Authority, for program sup-
port, is increased by $222,010, for the Juvenile Justice Information System upgrade project.
SECTION 99. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,133,300 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Oregon Youth
Authority, for debt service.
SECTION 100. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$3,138,258 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Youth Authority  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 11
ministrative Services and transferred to the  Oregon Youth Authority, for capital improve-
ments and the Juvenile Justice Information System upgrade project.
SECTION 101. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill  5041), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for facility programs, is
increased by $100,000, for capital improvement.
SECTION 102. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $247,500, for distribution to Southwestern
Oregon Community College, for the Tioga Hall elevators emergency modernization.
SECTION 103. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for  self-sufficiency
programs, is increased by $2,000,000, for resettlement and case management services.
SECTION 104. Section 248, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section  505, chapter
114, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 248.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  expenditures
established by section 4 (3), chapter 475, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Mis-
cellaneous  Receipts,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the
Oregon Business Development Department,  for infrastructure, is increased by the following amounts,
for the issuance of grants from proceeds of lottery revenue bonds, for the following projects:
(1) Umatilla Electrical Cooperative Association  Industrial Site [ Utility Expansion ] for
infrastructure and utility improvements : $5,000,000.
(2) City of Phoenix Industrial Improvements, South Valley Employment Center: $4,500,000.
(3) City  of Aumsville Wastewater Plant Construction and Sewer System Improvements:
$9,000,000.
(4) City of Molalla New Wastewater Treatment Plant: $5,000,000.
(5) City of Newport Wastewater Treatment and Conveyance System Improvements: $3,825,000.
(6) Port of Coos Bay Channel Modification: $20,000,000.
SECTION 105.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill 5002), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for Workday  Oregon, is increased by
$697,783, for personal service costs.
SECTION 106. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, for distribution to the
Portland Business Alliance Charitable Institute, Inc. to support  festivals in the Tom McCall
Waterfront Park in the City of Portland.
SECTION 107. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2  (13), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House
Bill 5002),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal
funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in
section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5002), collected or received by
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services debt service, is increased by $4,494,967.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 12
SECTION 108. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill  5002), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for enterprise asset management, is  in-
creased by $1,080,000, for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 109. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services from lottery moneys  allocated from
the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund for debt service and related costs
for bonds issued in previous biennia, is increased by $3,439,026.
SECTION 110. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses from proceeds of lottery bonds, collected or received by the  Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, for the provision of grants to the following entities,
for the following purposes, in the following amounts:
(1) City of Beaverton for the Meadowlark Senior Housing Project: $3,041,482.
(2) Oregon Museum of Science and Industry for  construction of OMSI district
infrastructure to support affordable housing and mixed use development: $5,073,845.
(3) Mid-Willamette Family YMCA Veterans Housing for the Albany Veterans  Apartments
Project: $3,402,760.
(4) City of Gresham for the Fire Station 74 replacement project: $8,091,785.
(5) Central Oregon Intergovernmental Council for the  CORE3 emergency coordination
center and public safety training facility: $10,128,616.
(6) McMinnville Fire District for a new fire station: $3,041,482.
(7) Lane County for the Lane Stabilization Center: $14,658,694.
(8) Columbia Memorial Hospital for expansion of the hospital: $6,078,256.
(9) Deschutes County for the Central Oregon Child Psychiatric Facility: $3,121,146.
(10) Mosaic Community Health for construction of a health care campus  that includes
primary care and other services: $4,045,902.
(11) Santiam  Hospital and Clinics Foundation for the Santiam Hospital and Clinics Am-
bulance Facility: $4,759,310.
(12) Mittleman Jewish Community Center for deferred maintenance, enhancing the ac-
cessibility of the pool area and renovations to expand childcare on site: $4,045,902.
(13) Marion Polk Food Share, Inc. for  acquisition of property to allow for a larger ware-
house and production kitchen: $6,080,215.
(14) City of Happy Valley for the Happy Valley Community Recreation Center:  $5,073,845.
(15) Willamette Falls Trust  for the Willamette Falls Inter-Tribal Public Access Project:
$45,436,500.
(16) Corvallis School District 509J for  the Osborn Aquatic Center Structural Rehabili-
tation Project: $4,045,902.
(17) James Beard Public Market for creation of a public market in Portland: $10,128,616.
(18) Warm Springs Community Action Team for the Warm Springs Commissary Project:
$3,843,973.
(19) Union County Fair Association for water and wastewater improvements: $2,539,405.
SECTION 111.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for distribution to the following
entities, for the following purposes:
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 13
(1) Oregon State Fair for the Oregon State Fair and Exposition Center (OSFEC) Regional
Emergency Center for emergency communications upgrades, water bottle filling  stations and
the water container system: $855,000.
(2) Jefferson County Fire District #1 for building expansion and remodel: $1,900,000.
(3) Hubbard Fire District for protective gear: $149,385.
(4) Fourth Dimension Recovery Center, DBA 4D Recovery,  for the Adolescent and Family
Recovery Campus: $1,000,000.
(5) Columbia County Child Abuse Assessment Center  for a permanent building for
Children’s Advocacy Services in Columbia County: $800,000.
(6) Northwest  Regional Education Service District for the antkwak Early Learning Cen-
ter: $2,000,000.
(7) Clackamas County Children’s Commission for the Gladstone Head Start Center:
$1,500,000.
(8) City of Medford for Santo Community Center for Discovery  Preschool enhancements:
$495,330.
(9) Mid-Willamette Valley Community Action Agency, Inc. for the  Woodburn Head Start
Modular Classroom Replacement Project: $950,000.
(10) City of Monmouth for  the operations of the Monmouth and Independence Trolley:
$1,000,000.
(11) City of Monmouth for equipment for the Monmouth and Independence  Trolley:
$750,000.
(12) Northwest Youth Corps for the Campus Capacity Upgrade Project: $2,000,000.
(13) Mt. Scott Park Center for Learning for the Mt. Scott Youth Center: $1,000,000.
(14) Prospect School District for the Back-up Power Project: $63,559.
(15) Wheeler County for the Wheeler County Food Pantry: $500,000.
(16) Hoyt Arboretum Friends Foundation  for the Growing for the Future, A Campaign for
Hoyt Arboretum’s Next Century: $2,000,000.
(17) City of Woodburn for the Woodburn’s Historic Settlemier  Park Revitalization
Project: $2,000,000.
(18) City of Salem for the Fairview Park Master Plan - Interpretive Space Park  planning
and development: $824,780.
(19) City of Keizer for the Keizer Rapids Park Synthetic Turf Fields Project: $750,000.
(20) The Canby Center for the Growing to Serve Project: $1,300,000.
(21) Wallowa History Center, Inc. for  the Bear Sleds Ranger Station House Restoration
Project: $400,000.
(22) Gresham Historical Society for the Historic Church Restoration Project: $200,000.
(23) Willamette Heritage Center  for the Preserving History and Strengthening Our
Community’s Gathering Place Project: $750,000.
(24) City of Hermiston for the Carnegie Library Renovation: $1,000,000.
(25) Helping Hands Resources for warehouse purchase, remodel and expansion: $952,514.
(26) Oswego Lake Watershed Council for the West Willamette  Watersheds Collaboration
Project: $200,000.
(27) Jackson County for the Community  Justice Transitional Housing Program:
$1,000,000.
(28) High Desert Partnership for the Center for Collaboration: $2,031,500.
(29) Community  Cancer Foundation, DBA Community Cancer Center, for quality assur-
ance equipment and the electronic medical records upgrade project: $176,721.
(30) City of Tigard for the Tigard Police, Public  Works, and Emergency Operations Cen-
ter Design Work: $3,000,000.
(31) City of Oakridge  for the Oakridge Community Health and Medical Services Center
at the Willamette Activity Center: $600,000.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 14
(32) City of Cottage Grove for the Cottage Grove  Armory ADA Access Improvement
Project: $90,000.
(33) Sutherlin Fire Department for Sutherlin  Fire Training Center improvements:
$504,000.
SECTION 112. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office by section 1,  chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5501), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, is increased
by $288,912, for affinity group task forces.
SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (7),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5536), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, for debt service and re-
lated costs, is increased by $418,304.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$552,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Revenue, for
debt service and related costs, for debt service.
SECTION 115.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$35,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in  this section, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for
debt service and related costs, for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 116.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (10), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5536),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5536), col-
lected or received by the Department of Revenue, for Information System  projects, is in-
creased by $2,000,000, for the Electronic Valuation Information System project.
NOTE: Sections 117 through 120 were deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for
Oregon Health and Science University education and  other programs, is increased by
$500,000, for distribution to the Oregon Perinatal Collaborative for maternal and childhood
health.
SECTION 122.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for behavioral health,  is
increased by $3,000,000, to provide transitional housing assistance to aid and  assist patients
exiting the Oregon State Hospital to reduce the possibility of becoming homeless.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, for the Oregon State
Hospital, is decreased by $3,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 124. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts,
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 15
marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority,
for state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $82,000, for costs of bond
issuance.
SECTION 125. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5025),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for debt service, is in-
creased by $1,720,156.
SECTION 126. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts,
marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by the Oregon Health  Authority,
for the Oregon State Hospital, is increased by $4,788,000, for capital improvements.
SECTION 127.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$401,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax  receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and
Medicare receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in this section,
collected or  received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments and enterprise-
wide costs, for debt service.
SECTION 128. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $17,000,000, for behavioral health,  for supplemental payments
to eligible employers for the purpose of the Oregon Essential  Workforce Health Care Pro-
gram established by ORS 735.520.
SECTION 129.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$25,500,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses  from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025  (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by the Oregon
Health Authority, for behavioral health, for supplemental payments  to eligible employers for
the purpose of the Oregon Essential Workforce Health Care Program established by  ORS
735.520.
SECTION 130. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for  deposit into the Illegal Marijuana
Market Enforcement Grant Program Fund established under ORS 475C.535.
SECTION 131. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5005), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission,
is increased by $5,000,000, for the Illegal Marijuana  Market Enforcement Grant Program
Fund established under ORS 475C.535 and  additional grants under the Illegal Marijuana
Market Enforcement Grant Program established under ORS 475C.531.
SECTION 132. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5520), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $355,481.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 16
SECTION 133. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5520), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the pro-
ceeds of bonds for the Orphan Site Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation and
air quality grants, drinking water protection, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants
and for smoke  monitoring laboratory services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5520), col-
lected or received by the Department of Environmental Quality,  for agency management, is
increased by $1,350,000, for project costs and the  cost of issuing bonds for laboratory and
monitoring equipment.
SECTION 134.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section  1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5521), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for debt service,  is in-
creased by $1,198,093.
SECTION 135. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5521), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds from the United  States Forest Service for fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5521), collected or received by the State Forestry
Department, for debt service, is increased by $2,159,713.
SECTION 136. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5521), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds from the United  States Forest Service for fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5521), collected or received by the State Forestry
Department, for agency administration, is increased by $374,947,  for the costs of issuing
general obligation bonds for capital improvements.
SECTION 137. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there are ap-
propriated to the Water Resources Department, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the provision of grants to the following en-
tities, for the following purposes:
(1) City of Dayton, Fisher Farm Wells Improvements: $1,218,750.
(2) City of Tualatin, Seismic Valving at Six Water Reservoirs: $1,750,000.
(3) City of Sublimity, Sublimity’s Well #5 Improvement Project: $280,000.
(4) City of Maupin, Water Lines - Distribution System Improvements: $1,500,000.
(5) City of Central Point, Gebhard Road Waterline Extension: $258,100.
SECTION 138.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Water  Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $2,500,000, to implement projects that benefit water de-
mands in the Walla Walla basin.
SECTION 139.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5543), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the director’s
office, is increased by $1,000,000, for feasibility study grants.
SECTION 140. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Water  Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 17
the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to be deposited into the Water Well  Abandon-
ment, Repair and Replacement Fund established by ORS 537.766.
SECTION 141. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5543), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau
of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States Army
Corps of Engineers, the United States  Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Adminis-
tration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation,  but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5543), collected or received by the Water Resources Department, for technical services,  is
increased by $1,000,000, for authorized expenditures of moneys deposited  in the Water Well
Abandonment, Repair and Replacement Fund established by ORS 537.766.
SECTION 142.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5543), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Water Resources Department for debt service, is increased by $341,064.
SECTION 143. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5543), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau
of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States Army
Corps of Engineers, the United States  Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Adminis-
tration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation,  but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5543), collected or received by the Water Resources Department,  for the director’s office, is
increased by $172,999, for the cost of issuing bonds.
SECTION 144.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3)(a), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025  (Enrolled House
Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  federal
funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in
section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5002), collected  or received by
the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the office of the State Chief Infor-
mation Officer - Policy, is increased by  $275,000, for a Multi-State Information Sharing and
Analysis Center membership fee.
SECTION 145. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Public Safety Standards  and Training, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $422,609, for operations, for the
learning management system.
SECTION 146. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 11  (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House
Bill 5024),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for operations, is increased
by $570,156, for administration of housing infrastructure financing.
SECTION 147. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 11 (3), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2025 (Enrolled House
Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 18
expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Business Development  Department, for infrastructure, is in-
creased by $647,430, for administration of housing infrastructure financing.
SECTION 148. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 11 (2), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2025 (Enrolled House
Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, innovation and
trade, is increased by $4,800,000, for technical assistance to underrepresented businesses.
SECTION 149.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $3,220,001, for the purpose of funding Center
for Innovative Excellence grants provided to signature research centers.
SECTION 150. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $150,000,000,  for the seismic rehabilitation grant
program.
SECTION 151. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $1,490,000, for the costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 152. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 1 (4), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for debt
service, is increased by $6,640,262.
SECTION 153.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $100,000,000, for Coos Bay Channel deepening.
SECTION 154. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $815,000, for the costs of bond issuance.
NOTE: Section 155 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 156. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Expenses from the Container Port Improvement  Fund established by section 17,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5531): $20,000,000.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 19
(2) Expenses from  the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established by
section 28, chapter 748,  Oregon Laws 2017, for Portland Metro levee system improvements:
$20,000,000.
(3) Expenses from the  Levee Project Grant Fund established by ORS 285B.421: $10,000,000.
(4) Expenses from the Marine Navigation Improvement Fund established under ORS
777.267 related to Lower Columbia River channel improvements: $15,000,000.
(5) Expenses from the Industrial Site Loan Fund established under section 12, chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 2411): $10,000,000.
SECTION 157. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $1 is
established for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for infrastructure, for expenses  from the Housing Infrastructure
Project Fund established by  section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
3031).
SECTION 158. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by the following amounts, for distribution as  grants
to the following entities for the following purposes:
(1) Morrow County, Clean Water Consortium Nitrate Water Project - West  Glen Neigh-
borhood: $2,861,000.
(2) City of Estacada, Estacada Wastewater Treatment Plant: $5,000,000.
(3) City of Sandy, Sandy Clean Waters Project: $5,000,000.
(4) Oak  Lodge Water Services Authority, Inflow and Infiltration Reduction Program:
$3,300,000.
(5) City of Eugene, Clear Lake Road Economic Development Infrastructure: $6,000,000.
(6) South Suburban Sanitary District, Wastewater Treatment Plant Upgrades: $10,000,000.
(7) City of Hubbard, Wastewater Facilities Plan Projects Phase 1 and 2: $2,361,910.
(8) City of Burns, repair of drainage and wastewater treatment infrastructure  impacted
by flooding: $3,000,000.
(9) City of John Day, Wastewater Treatment Facility Construction: $5,000,000.
(10) City of Adair Village, Wastewater Treatment Plant Improvements: $4,000,000.
(11) City of Sherwood, Brookman Trunk Sewer Extension Project: $3,225,000.
(12) Confederated Tribes  of Warm Springs, for work on the existing drinking water
treatment plant’s filtration system: $3,000,000.
(13) Harney County, projects to minimize flooding through repair and improvement of
infrastructure, including working on dikes, levees, dredging and vegetation  thinning along
waterways: $3,000,000.
SECTION 159.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there are ap-
propriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1,  2025, out of the General Fund, for infrastructure, the following amounts, to be dis-
tributed as grants to the following entities, for the following purposes:
(1) City of Dundee, 5th Street Water Line Upgrade: $325,000.
(2) City of Rainier, Westside Sewer and Storm Line Rehabilitation: $500,000.
(3) City of Monmouth, Recycled Water Use Site Development: $1,400,000.
(4) City of Veneta, Wastewater Treatment  Plant Expansion Wetland Mitigation Credits:
$1,693,000.
(5) City of Winston, Abraham & Highway 42 Sewer Improvements: $946,700.
(6) City of Culver, Mainline Sewer Reroute to Residential Development: $379,705.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 20
SECTION 160. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there are ap-
propriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund,  for deposit into the Cultural Resources Economic Fund
established under section 6, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, the  following amounts for dis-
tribution as grants to the following entities for the following purposes:
(1) Columbia River Maritime  Museum, Mariners Hall Exhibition and Education building:
$700,000.
(2) World Forestry Center, Campus Transformation Project: $1,000,000.
(3) Coos Art Museum, REFRESH Capital Campaign: $325,000.
(4) Eastern Oregon Regional Theatre, Baker Orpheum Theatre Phase 5 Structural  Up-
grades: $600,000.
(5) The Museum at Warm Springs, Permanent Exhibition Renewal: $1,500,000.
(6) B-17 Alliance Foundation, Campaign to purchase Lacey Lady’s Home: $350,000.
(7) Historic Jacksonville, Inc., Jacksonville Museum Without Walls: $150,000.
(8) Mt. Hood Cultural Center and Museum, Phase 1 Capital Expansion Project: $450,000.
(9) Salem Art Association,  Historic Bush House Museum Restoration and Accessibility:
$175,000.
(10) Maxville Heritage Interpretive Center, Maxville Historic Restoration Project:
$300,000.
(11) Oregon Shakespeare Festival Association, Black Swan Theatre Renovation for  New
Works Development: $375,000.
(12) High Desert Museum, High Desert Museum: $2,000,000.
(13) Historic Elsinore Theatre, Elsinore Theatre Facade renovation  and new signage:
$350,000.
SECTION 161.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 11 (5), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2025 (Enrolled House
Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for  lottery bond debt ser-
vice, is increased by $4,360,052.
SECTION 162. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $2,080,532, for the costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 163. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1 (2), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5011), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, for
Project-Based Rental Housing Assistance, is increased  by $2,500,000, for additional services
subsidies to newly developed permanent supportive housing units expected to be  occupied by
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 164. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
from the  United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract ser-
vices, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill 5011), collected or received by the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department, for Multifamily Rental Housing  Programs, is increased by
$11,175,000, for the development, rehabilitation or preservation of  housing for older adults
and persons with disabilities.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 21
SECTION 165. Section 275, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 275.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is  appropriated to the
Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000 for one or more grants to nonprofit  organizations for the
following purposes [ of] in Lane County, with a preference for Springfield, Oregon:
(1) Developing, purchasing and placing manufactured homes in a manufactured dwelling
park; or
(2) Developing or improving infrastructure for a manufactured dwelling  park [ in Springfield,
Oregon].
NOTE: Sections 166 to 168 were deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 169. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1 (7), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for debt
service for bond related activities, is increased by $30,351,647.
SECTION 170. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$8,002,945 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission, for expenses related to distribution  center management and distilled
spirit supply chain information technology systems.
SECTION 171. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$624,272 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission, for the costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 172. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5019), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commis-
sion, for debt service, is increased by $7,371,073.
SECTION 173. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter 450, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses by the Department of Ed-
ucation from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the department for the
State School Fund from the Fund  for Student Success established under ORS 327.001, is de-
creased by $4,488,092, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 174. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, for the State School
Fund, is increased by $18,757,768, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 175. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5516), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Department of Education for the  State School Fund, is decreased by $18,757,768,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 176. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 22
Oregon Health and Science University education  and other programs, is increased by
$100,000.
SECTION 177. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5542), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the State Treasurer, for
trust property services, is increased by $568,589, to implement the provisions of  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 2089).
NOTE: Section 178 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 179. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract  ser-
vices, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5011), collected or received by the  Housing and Com-
munity Services Department, for Multifamily  Rental Housing Programs, is increased by
$50,000,000, to provide financial assistance to aid in  the acquisition, renovation or mainte-
nance of properties with project-based federal rental assistance contracts, public  housing
undergoing significant recapitalization  or publicly supported housing as defined in ORS
456.250.
SECTION 180. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
from the  United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract ser-
vices, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill 5011), collected or received by the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department, for Single Family Housing Programs,  is increased by $2,500,000,
to preserve the affordability of manufactured dwelling parks.
SECTION 181. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Housing and Community Services Department for bond-related activities, is  in-
creased by $2,473,883, for debt service.
SECTION 182. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter 450, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  the State School Fund, is increased by $4,488,092, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 183. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$385,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission, for costs of bond issuance for community colleges.
SECTION 184. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 8 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds and funds described in sections 12 to  16, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525),  collected or received by the Higher Education
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 23
Coordinating Commission, is  increased by $3,812,147 for costs of bond issuance for public
universities.
SECTION 185. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of  the General Fund, for arts, the following amounts to be distributed as grants
to the following entities:
(1) Portland Center Stage: $1,500,000.
(2) Oregon Shakespeare Festival: $2,500,000.
SECTION 186.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 7 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5515),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses, other than expenses described in sections 8 and 16, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5515), from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax  funds and federal funds, col-
lected or  received by the Department of Education, for operations, is increased by $617,359,
for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 187. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 7 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5515),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses, other than expenses described in sections 8 and 16, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5515), from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax  funds and federal funds, col-
lected or received by the Department of  Education, for capital bonding, is increased by
$50,000,000, for matching grants made to school districts for construction or  improvement
to school facilities through the Oregon School Capital Improvement Matching Program.
SECTION 188. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 7 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5515), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses, other than expenses described in sections 8 and 16, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5515), from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, corporate  activity tax funds and federal funds, col-
lected or received by the Department of Education,  for capital bonding, is increased by
$15,000,000, for Broadband Connecting Oregon Schools Grants.
SECTION 189. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$9,597,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds,  collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Education, for debt service.
SECTION 190. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5515), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Department of Education for debt service, is increased by $1,480,739.
SECTION 191. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department  of Corrections, for central
administration and administrative services,  is increased by $2,250,000, for the Computerized
Maintenance Management System Information Technology Project.
SECTION 192. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$1,322,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 24
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Military
Department, for debt service.
SECTION 193. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,033,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
State Police, for debt service.
SECTION 194. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract  ser-
vices, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5011), collected or received by the  Housing and Com-
munity Services Department, for bond  activities, is increased by $5,544,194, for the costs of
bond issuance.
SECTION 195. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$1,780,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the State Parks and
Recreation Department, for debt service.
SECTION 196. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,825,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Transportation, for  the costs of bond issuance for the Interstate 5 bridge replacement
project.
NOTE: Section 197 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 198. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$436,500 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Transportation, for the costs of bond issuance for  the Hood River-White Salmon Bridge Re-
placement Project.
SECTION 199. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$45,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Transportation, for the Hood River-White Salmon Bridge Replacement Project.
SECTION 200. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out
of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000,  for the City of Cascade Locks McCord Creek
Bridge Powerline Relocation Project.
SECTION 201. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, for the Boone Bridge Replacement Project.
SECTION 202. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,849,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Ad-
ministration Committee, for debt service.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 25
SECTION 203. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5515),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from fees,  moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding  lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds
and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Education for  programs other
than those specified in  sections 7 and 16, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5515), for the Educator Advancement Council, is  increased by $14,000,000, for Grow Your
Own and Oregon Administrator Scholar programs.
SECTION 204. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5029), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police, for Fish
and Wildlife, is increased by $146,195,  for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 2558).
SECTION 205.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $260,118, for the Building Codes Division,
for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 2658).
SECTION 206. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for a landowner offset against the cost  of fire pro-
tection provided by the State Forestry Department.
SECTION 207. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5543), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau
of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States Army
Corps of Engineers, the United States  Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Adminis-
tration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation,  but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5543), collected or received by the Water Resources Department,  for the director’s office, is
increased by $8,000,000, for water development projects.
SECTION 208.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5543), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau
of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States Army
Corps of Engineers, the United States  Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Adminis-
tration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation,  but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5543), collected or received by the Water Resources Department,  for the director’s office, is
increased by  $6,500,000, for design and construction of the Henrici Reservoir #2 in Oregon
City.
SECTION 209.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 26
ment, for arts, is increased by $8,275,000,  for expenditures from the Cultural Resources
Economic Fund established by section 6, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 210. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of State Police, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,841,434, for Criminal Justice  Information Services, for im-
plementation of chapter 1, Oregon  Laws 2023, and to carry out the provisions of chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 243).
SECTION 211. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $12,182,349, to be allocated to  the Department of State Police
for implementation of chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023, and chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 243).
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 212. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5511), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer
and Business Services,  for the Building Codes Division, is increased by $1,089,903, for addi-
tional state plan examiners.
SECTION 213. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for
Higher Education Coordinating Commission programs and  operations, is increased by
$5,000,000, for deposit in the Oregon Conservation Corps Fund established under  ORS 476.698.
SECTION 214.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds and funds described in sections 12 to  16, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected  or received by the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission, for Higher Education Coordinating Commission  programs and re-
lated grants, is  increased by $5,000,000, for payments out of the Oregon Conservation Corps
Fund established under ORS 476.698.
SECTION 215. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1 (1), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House  Bill 5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for
Housing Stabilization Programs, is increased by $11,000,000, for eviction  and homelessness
prevention services.
SECTION 216. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for central services,
is increased by $2,500,000, for activities to address water contamination  issues in the Lower
Umatilla Basin Groundwater Management Area.
SECTION 217. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2025
(Enrolled House Bill  5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for public health, is in-
creased by $1,500,000, for activities to address  water contamination issues in the Lower
Umatilla Basin Groundwater Management Area.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 27
SECTION 218. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5536),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section  2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5536), col-
lected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Business Division, is increased by
$177,902, for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 3940).
SECTION 219. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (6),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5536), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, for the Information
Technology Services Division, is increased by $198,812, for implementation  of chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 3940).
SECTION 220. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5536), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section  2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5536), col-
lected or received by  the Department of Revenue, for the Information Technology Services
Division, is increased by $44,983, for implementation  of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 3940).
SECTION 221. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section  1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5521), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, for fire protection, is
increased by $4,000,000, for wildfire cameras.
SECTION 222. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and  Industries by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled House  Bill 5015), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, is increased by
$2,500,000, for the Firefighter Apprenticeship Program.
SECTION 223. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $7,500,000,  for the purpose of offsetting potential increases in
landowner forest patrol assessments.
SECTION 224. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the following agen-
cies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5501 1 +5,698
Oregon Department of
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 28
Administrative Services:
Chief Operating Office
Other funds HB 5002 2(1) +27,697
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5002 1(6) -315,880
Chief Financial Office
Other funds HB 5002 2(2) +12,612
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer - Policy
Other funds HB 5002 2(3)(a) +48,412
Chief Human Resources
Office
Other funds HB 5002 2(4) +91,922
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Operations
Other funds HB 5002 2(5)(a) -21,348
Enterprise Asset
Management
Other funds HB 5002 2(7) +82,677
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Other funds HB 5002 2(8) +455,199
Business Services
Other funds HB 5002 2(9) +3,393,329
Capital Improvements
Other funds HB 5002 2(10) +2,819,680
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds HB 5002 2(13) +265,690
ODAS Information
Technology
Other funds HB 5002 2(14) +3,193
Debt Service and Related
Costs for Bonds Issued
Lottery funds HB 5002 3 -5,773,820
Public Records Advocate:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5535 1 +7,200
State Treasurer:
Administrative Services
Other funds SB 5542 1(1) +50,503
Trust Property Services
Other funds SB 5542 1(2) +29,113
Investment Services
Other funds SB 5542 1(3) +40,304
Public Savings Services
Other funds SB 5542 1(4) +99,200
State and Local Government
Financial Services
Other funds SB 5542 1(5) +18,284
Oregon Racing Commission:
Operating Expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 29
Other funds HB 5035 1 +31,040
Public Employees
Retirement System:
Central Administration
Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(1) -144,951
Financial and Administrative
Services Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(2) -1,448,524
Information Services
Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(3) +2,253,496
Operations Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(4) -16,035
Compliance, Audit and
Risk Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(5) +157,191
Secretary of State:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund SB 5537 1(1) -7,937
Other funds SB 5537 2(1) -57,249
Elections Division
General Fund SB 5537 1(2) +74,370
Other funds SB 5537 2(2) +81
Federal funds SB 5537 3 +10,413
Audits Division
Other funds SB 5537 2(3) -30,602
Archives Division
Other funds SB 5537 2(4) -146,577
Corporation Division
Other funds SB 5537 2(5) -48,010
Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission:
Administrative Expenses
Other funds HB 5019 1(1) +16,630
Marijuana Regulation
- Recreational
Other funds HB 5019 1(2) +88,244
Marijuana Regulation
- Medical
Other funds HB 5019 1(3) +13,155
Debt Service
Other funds HB 5019 1(7) -537,490
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund SB 5536 1(1) -314,189
Other funds SB 5536 2(1) -156,074
Property Tax Division
General Fund SB 5536 1(2) +243,275
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 30
Other funds SB 5536 2(2) -18,133
Personal Tax and
Compliance Division
General Fund SB 5536 1(3) -28,950
Other funds SB 5536 2(3) -5,793
Business Division
General Fund SB 5536 1(4) +160,186
Other funds SB 5536 2(4) +8,330
Collections Division
General Fund SB 5536 1(5) +57,480
Other funds SB 5536 2(5) -91,775
Information Technology
Services Division
General Fund SB 5536 1(6) -173,756
Other funds SB 5536 2(7) -103,358
Debt Service and Related
Costs
General Fund SB 5536 1(7) -591,509
Corporate Division
Other funds SB 5536 2(6) -30,418
Marijuana Program
Other funds SB 5536 2(8) -16,740
Senior Property Tax
Deferral Program
Other funds SB 5536 2(9) +21,752
Employment Relations
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5008 1 -2,489
Assessments of Agencies
Other funds HB 5008 3 -1,763
Office of the Governor:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5523 1 -368,141
Other funds SB 5523 4 +25,207
Regional Solutions
Lottery funds SB 5523 3 +29,293
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5522 1 +35,644
State Library:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5017 1 -6,460
Operating Expenses
- Assessments
Other funds HB 5017 3 -56,027
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 31
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5001 1 +60,755
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5540 1 +14,370
Construction Contractors
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5509 1 +61,226
Mental Health Regulatory
Agency
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists:
Other funds SB 5532 1 +92,510
Oregon Board of
Psychology:
Other funds SB 5532 2 +63,025
State Board of Chiropractic
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5507 1 +44,047
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5018 1 +27,865
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5512 1 +35,003
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
State Mortuary and
Cemetery Board
Other funds SB 5524 1 +7,432
Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine
Other funds SB 5524 2 +7,006
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds SB 5524 3 +3,951
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds SB 5524 4 +19,075
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 32
Other funds SB 5524 5 +16,805
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds SB 5524 6 +8,717
Bureau of Labor and
Industries:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5015 1 -381,487
Other funds HB 5015 2 -213,138
Federal funds HB 5015 4 -52,372
Public Utility Commission:
Utility Program
Other funds HB 5034 1(1) +478,286
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Other funds HB 5034 1(2) +18,718
Administration
Other funds HB 5034 1(3) +97,711
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds HB 5034 1(4) +20,229
Department of Consumer
and Business Services:
Workers’ Compensation
Board
Other funds SB 5511 1(1) -40,026
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds SB 5511 1(2) -53,310
Oregon OSHA
Other funds SB 5511 1(3) +117,917
Central Services Division
Other funds SB 5511 1(4) -183,213
Division of Financial
Regulation
Other funds SB 5511 1(5) +63,952
Building Codes Division
Other funds SB 5511 1(6) -31,999
Federal funds SB 5511 2(3) +362
Universal Health Plan
Governance Board
General Fund SB 5511 3 +5,231
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5036 1 +45,824
Oregon State Board of
Nursing:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5023 1 +259,702
Oregon Medical Board:
Operating Expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 33
Other funds HB 5022 1 +164,994
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5028 1 +128,176
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Business, Innovation and
Trade
Other funds HB 5024 8(2) -26,851
Lottery funds HB 5024 11(2) -9,408
Federal funds HB 5024 12(2) +69
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5024 1(4) -10,576,760
Infrastructure
General Fund HB 5024 1(2) -3,830
Other funds HB 5024 8(3) -17,133
Lottery funds HB 5024 11(3) -8,712
Federal funds HB 5024 12(3) -7,190
Operations
General Fund HB 5024 1(1) -2,280
Other funds HB 5024 8(1) -18,723
Lottery funds HB 5024 11(1) -39,848
Federal funds HB 5024 12(1) -2,842
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5024 11(5) +839,676
Arts
General Fund HB 5024 1(3) -2,806
Other funds HB 5024 8(4) -5,825
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Housing Stabilization
Programs
General Fund HB 5011 1(1) +8,061
Other funds HB 5011 2(1) +1,221
Federal funds HB 5011 4(1) +181
Multifamiliy Rental
Housing Programs
General Fund HB 5011 1(3) +27
Other funds HB 5011 2(3) +278,755
Federal funds HB 5011 4(3) +416
Single family
Housing Programs
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 34
General Fund HB 5011 1(4) +1,375
Other funds HB 5011 2(4) +3,800
Central Services
General Fund HB 5011 1(6) -37,719
Other funds HB 5011 2(6) -203,543
Federal funds HB 5011 4(6) -29,032
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5011 1(7) -9,113,807
Other funds HB 5011 2(7) +1,712,388
Lottery funds HB 5011 3 +136,005
Project-Based Rental
Housing Assistance
Other funds HB 5011 2(2) +597
Federal funds HB 5011 4(2) +199
Disaster Recovery and
Resilience
Federal funds HB 5011 4(5) +2,877
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Operations
General Fund HB 5038 1(1) +1,100
Lottery funds HB 5038 2(1) +1,456
Appeals and Special
Advocacy
General Fund HB 5038 1(2) -2,295
Lottery funds HB 5038 2(2) -3,104
Strategic Partnership
General Fund HB 5038 1(3) +1,953
Lottery funds HB 5038 2(3) +3,316
Aging Veteran Services
General Fund HB 5038 1(4) -245
Lottery funds HB 5038 2(4) -3,865
OR War Veterans’ Bond
- operations
Other funds HB 5038 4(1)(a) +28,763
OR War Veterans’ Bond
- home loan
Other funds HB 5038 4(1)(b) +46,431
OR War Veterans’ Bond
- OR Veterans’ Home
Other funds HB 5038 4(1)(c) +16,777
Employment Department:
Unemployment Insurance,
Shared Services and
Workforce Operations,
Contributions and Recovery,
and Workforce and
Economic Research
Other funds HB 5007 1(1) -828,480
Operating Budget
Federal funds HB 5007 4 +46,642
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 35
(4) EDUCATION.
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5037 2 +274,607
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund SB 5515 1(1) -577,145
Other funds SB 5515 7(2) -623,149
Federal funds SB 5515 9(1) +14,204
Debt Service for General
Obligation Bonds
General Fund SB 5515 4 -11,985,310
Debt Service
Lottery funds SB 5515 6 -3,046,150
Department of Early
Learning and Care:
Operations
General Fund SB 5514 1(1) -82,980
Other funds SB 5514 3(1) +832
Federal funds SB 5514 4(1) +63,726
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
HECC programs, grants
and operations
General Fund SB 5525 1(1) -146,012
Other funds SB 5525 8(1) -1,581
Federal funds SB 5525 11 -24,808
Debt Service
general obligation bonds
Public Universities
General Fund SB 5525
1(11)(a) -19,464,777
Debt Service
general obligation bonds
Community Colleges
General Fund SB 5525
1(11)(b) -2,817,067
Debt Service
general obligation bonds
FAMIS
General Fund SB 5525
1(11)(d) -206,231 
Debt-related costs
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 36
- bonds
Public Universities
General Fund SB 5525
1(11)(f) -87,586
Debt-related costs
- bonds
Community Colleges
General Fund SB 5525
1(11)(g) -11,382
Lottery Debt Service - From
Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund
for Public Universities
Lottery funds SB 5525 2 -645,288
Lottery Debt Service - From
Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund
for Community Colleges
Lottery funds SB 5525 3 -2,167,089
Debt Service
- Lottery and General
Obligation Bonds
Public Universities
Other funds SB 5525 8(2) +8,632,895
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General Program and Services
Provided to Care Facility
Residents
General Fund HB 5020 1(1) +46,416
Public Guardian and
Conservator Program
General Fund HB 5020 1(2) +82,964
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5020 2 +814
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5003 1 +24,990
Other funds HB 5003 2 +1,282
Federal funds HB 5003 3 +23,254
Psychiatric Security Review
Board:
Operating Expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 37
General Fund HB 5030 1 -42,387
Department of Human
Services:
Central Services
General Fund SB 5526 1(1) +120,202
Other funds SB 5526 2(1) +15,650
Federal funds SB 5526 3(1) +122,311
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund SB 5526 1(2) +1,091,777
Other funds SB 5526 2(2) +112,748
Federal funds SB 5526 3(2) +331,041
Self-Sufficiency Programs
General Fund SB 5526 1(3) +120,202
Other funds SB 5526 2(3) +1,422
Federal funds SB 5526 3(3) +75,569
Vocational Rehabilitation
Services
General Fund SB 5526 1(4) +10,304
Other funds SB 5526 2(4) +40
Federal funds SB 5526 3(4) +10,404
Child Welfare Programs
General Fund SB 5526 1(5) +6,874,618
Federal funds SB 5526 3(5) +5,530,056
Aging and People With
Disabilities Programs
General Fund SB 5526 1(6) +100,592
Other funds SB 5526 2(6) +7,473
Federal funds SB 5526 3(6) +72,821
Intellectual/Developmental
Disabilities Programs
General Fund SB 5526 1(7) +52,475
Other funds SB 5526 2(7) +2
Federal funds SB 5526 3(7) +54,496
Oregon Eligibility
Partnership
General Fund SB 5526 1(8) +141,534
Federal funds SB 5526 3(8) +184,911
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5526 1(9) -1,900
Shared Services
Other funds SB 5526 2(8) +327,360
Oregon Health Authority:
Medicaid
General Fund HB 5025 1(1) +18,700
Other funds HB 5025 2(1) +41,581
Federal funds HB 5025 5(1) +215,953
Behavioral Health
General Fund HB 5025 1(2) +144,341
Other funds HB 5025 2(2) -3,124
Lottery funds HB 5025 3(2) +226
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 38
Federal funds HB 5025 5(2) +18,333
Health Policy and
Analytics
General Fund HB 5025 1(3) +23,852
Other funds HB 5025 2(3) +193,585
Federal funds HB 5025 5(3) +12,065
Public Health
General Fund HB 5025 1(4) +148,170
Other funds HB 5025 2(5) +326,759
Federal funds HB 5025 5(4) -1,711
Oregon State Hospital
General Fund HB 5025 1(5) +106,066
Federal funds HB 5025 5(5) -163
Central Services
General Fund HB 5025 1(6) +96,517
Other funds HB 5025 2(8) +7,871
Federal funds HB 5025 5(6) +13,401
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund HB 5025 1(7) -7,082,428
Other funds HB 5025 2(9) -538,347
Federal funds HB 5025 5(7) -1,084,632
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5025 1(9) -551,383
Lottery funds HB 5025 3(6) -3,610,976
Behavioral Health
Workforce - ARPA
Other funds HB 5025 2(4) -22,004
Drug Treatment and
Recovery Services
Other funds HB 5025 2(6) -458
Shared Administrative
Services
Other funds HB 5025 2(10) +2,126
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund HB 5013 1 +5,491
Judicial Department:
Operations
General Fund HB 5012 1(2) -589,820
Debt Service
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 39
General Fund HB 5012 1(5) -2,157,864
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund HB 5016 1(1) +20,096
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5016 1(2) -5,125,414
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund HB 5016 6 -153,647
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
General Program
General Fund HB 5016 11 -9,492
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5016 14(1) +5,973
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5016 15 +35,763
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5016 16 +1,099
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5016 17 +865
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 40
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Other funds HB 5021 1(1) +143,201
State Department of
Energy:
Energy Planning and
Innovation
General Fund SB 5518 1(1) +1,837
Energy Development
Services
General Fund SB 5518 1(2) +4,098
Operations
Other funds SB 5518 2 +50,082
Federal funds SB 5518 3 +4,795
State Department of
Geology and Mineral
Industries:
Geologic Survey
General Fund HB 5010 1(1) -76,353
Mined Land Reclamation
Other funds HB 5010 2(2) +17,895
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5026 1 -1,750,000
Lottery funds HB 5026 4 -106,090
Director’s Office
Other funds HB 5026 2(1) +10,820
Lottery funds HB 5026 3(1) +11,951
Central Services
Other funds HB 5026 2(2) -507,593
Lottery funds HB 5026 3(2) -507,595
Direct Services
Other funds HB 5026 2(4) -30,673
Lottery funds HB 5026 3(4) -30,674
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund SB 5529 1 -21,477
Water Resources
 Department:
Administrative Services
General Fund SB 5543 1(1) -66,373
Other funds SB 5543 3(1) +148
Field Services
General Fund SB 5543 1(2) -42,638
Other funds SB 5543 3(2) +253
Water Rights and
Adjudications
General Fund SB 5543 1(3) -20,645
Other funds SB 5543 3(3) +645
Technical Services
General Fund SB 5543 1(4) -11,313
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 41
Other funds SB 5543 3(4) +759
Director’s Office
General Fund SB 5543 1(5) +232,483
Other funds SB 5543 3(5) +2,832
Debt Service
Lottery funds SB 5543 2 -3,087,755
Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board:
Operations
Other funds HB 5039 8(1) +36,803
Lottery funds HB 5039 6 -15,776
Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5039 7 -41,460
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund
Programs
Other funds SB 5539 1(1) +55,728
Portland Harbor
Cleanup Fund
Other funds SB 5539 2 +1,040
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and
Support Services
General Fund SB 5502 1(1) +77,907
Other funds SB 5502 2(1) +192,619
Food Safety
General Fund SB 5502 1(2) +315,843
Other funds SB 5502 2(2) +126,022
Federal funds SB 5502 4(1) +23,337
Natural Resources
General Fund SB 5502 1(3) +311,420
Other funds SB 5502 2(3) +55,462
Federal funds SB 5502 4(2) +490
Market Access
General Fund SB 5502 1(4) +136,585
Other funds SB 5502 2(4) +81,673
Federal funds SB 5502 4(3) +14,484
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds SB 5502 3 +89,240
Department of
Environmental Quality:
Air Quality
General Fund SB 5520 1(1) +99,833
Other funds SB 5520 2(1) +53,075
Federal funds SB 5520 5(1) +5,148
Water Quality
General Fund SB 5520 1(2) +58,443
Other funds SB 5520 2(2) +58,917
Lottery funds SB 5520 3 +14,710
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 42
Federal funds SB 5520 5(2) +7,654
Land Quality
Other funds SB 5520 2(3) +154,988
Federal funds SB 5520 5(3) +8,468
Agency Management
Other funds SB 5520 2(4) +1,410,014
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5520 1(5) -71,300
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
General Fund HB 5009 1(1) +153,524
Other funds HB 5009 2(1) +244,154
Lottery funds HB 5009 3(1) +72
Federal funds HB 5009 5(1) +280
Wildlife Division
General Fund HB 5009 1(2) +823
Other funds HB 5009 2(2) -224,293
Lottery funds HB 5009 3(2) +136
Federal funds HB 5009 5(2) +4,017
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund HB 5009 1(3) -611,562
Other funds HB 5009 2(3) -342,110
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5009 1(4) +175,285
Other funds HB 5009 2(5) +348,000
Lottery funds HB 5009 4 -131,260
Habitat Division
General Fund HB 5009 1(7) +163
Other funds HB 5009 2(7) -57,403
Federal funds HB 5009 5(5) +299
Capital Improvement
Other funds HB 5009 2(4) -28,987
State Forestry Department:
Agency Administration
Other funds SB 5521 2(1) -1,426,714
Federal funds SB 5521 4(1) +9
Fire Protection
General Fund SB 5521 1(2) +1,782
Other funds SB 5521 2(2) +8,160
Federal funds SB 5521 4(2) +64,975
Forest Resources
General Fund SB 5521 1(3) +18,049
Other funds SB 5521 2(4) +6,984
Federal funds SB 5521 4(4) +2,678
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5521 1(4) -308,720
Other funds SB 5521 2(6) -47,440
State Forests
Other funds SB 5521 2(3) +40,295
Equipment Pool
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 43
Other funds SB 5521 2(7) +4,858
Debt Service and Costs
related to the purchase
of land in Gilchrist
Forest
Lottery funds SB 5521 3 -571,207
Department of Land
Conservation and
Development:
Planning Program
General Fund SB 5528 1(1) +315,369
Other funds SB 5528 2(1) +6,460
Federal funds SB 5528 3 -91,998
Columbia River Gorge
Commission:
General Fund SB 5508 1 -8,193
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund HB 5027 1 +223,312
Department of State Police:
Patrol and Public Safety
Services, Criminal
Investigations and Gaming
Enforcement
General Fund HB 5029 1(1) -140,554
Other funds HB 5029 2(1) -55,704
Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement
Other funds HB 5029 2(2) -63,817
Lottery funds HB 5029 4 -17,093
Forensic Services and
Office of the Chief
Medical Examiner
General Fund HB 5029 1(3) +81
Federal funds HB 5029 3(3) +3,049
Office of the Superintendent,
Support Services and
Criminal Justice
Information Services
General Fund HB 5029 1(4) -711,983
Other funds HB 5029 2(4) -97,403
Bond Debt Service
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 44
General Fund HB 5029 1(5) -4,455,613
Department of Corrections:
Central Administration
and Administrative Services
General Fund HB 5004 1(2) +5,554,101
Operations and Health
Services
Other funds HB 5004 2(1) +1,547
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5004 1(5) -6,408,462
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
Operations
General Fund HB 5005 1 +20,621
Grant Disbursement,
Forfeiture and Marijuana
Tax Revenues
Other funds HB 5005 3 -11,485
Program and Grant Funding
Federal funds HB 5005 4 -12,954
District Attorneys
and Deputies:
Department of Justice
for District Attorneys
General Fund SB 5513 1 +84,423
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
General Fund HB 5014 1(1) -1,151
Other funds HB 5014 2(1) -168,471
Appellate Division
General Fund HB 5014 1(2) +51,423
Other funds HB 5014 2(2) -59,202
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund HB 5014 1(3) -24,087
Other funds HB 5014 2(5) -1,936
Federal funds HB 5014 3(2) -1,772
Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division
General Fund HB 5014 1(4) -10,099
Other funds HB 5014 2(6) +41,272
Federal funds HB 5014 3(3) -48,908
Defense of Criminal
Convictions
General Fund HB 5014 1(5) +5,016,095
Division of Child Support
General Fund HB 5014 1(6) +213,671
Other funds HB 5014 2(9) +101,462
Federal funds HB 5014 3(4) +596,347
Civil Enforcement Division
Other funds HB 5014 2(3) +819,889
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 45
Federal funds HB 5014 3(1) +30,220
Child Advocacy Division
Other funds HB 5014 2(4) -177,006
General Counsel Division
Other funds HB 5014 2(7) -200,679
Trial Division
Other funds HB 5014 2(8) -135,524
Debt Service and Related
Costs
Other funds HB 5014 2(10) -255,798
Oregon Military
Department:
Administration
General Fund SB 5533 1(1) -247,478
Other funds SB 5533 2(1) +5,923
Operations
General Fund SB 5533 1(2) +722,374
Other funds SB 5533 2(2) +17,170
Federal funds SB 5533 3(1) +1,488,368
Community Support
General Fund SB 5533 1(3) -79,419
Other funds SB 5533 2(3) +11,266
Federal funds SB 5533 3(2) +46,674
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5533 1(4) -1,464,391
Department of Emergency
Management:
Administration
General Fund SB 5517 1(1) -630,803
Other funds SB 5517 2(1) +11,227
Federal funds SB 5517 3(1) +290
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5517 1(4) -343,000
Department of Public
Safety Standards and
Training:
Operations
Other funds HB 5032 2(1) +49,241
Public Safety Memorial
Fund
Other funds HB 5032 2(2) -44
Oregon Youth Authority:
Program Support
General Fund HB 5041 1(3) -1,884,667
Federal funds HB 5041 3(2) -56,536
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5041 1(6) -1,342,261
Department of the State
Fire Marshal:
Office of the State Fire
Marshal
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 46
General Fund SB 5538 1(1) +100
Business Services
General Fund SB 5538 1(2) +14,414
Office of the State Fire
Marshal, Business Services,
Emergency Response, Fire
and Life Safety Services,
and Fire and Life Safety
Education
Other funds SB 5538 2(1) +244,400
Regulatory Services
Other funds SB 5538 2(2) +2,696
Federal funds
Federal funds SB 5538 3 +199
Public Defense Commission:
Appellate Division
General Fund HB 5031 1(3) +4,677
Administrative Services
Division - Administrative
Services
General Fund HB 5031 -37,289
1(10)(a)
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds SB 5504 1(1) +19,425
Department of
Transportation:
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5541 1(1) -2,801,828
Lottery funds SB 5541 4 -16,658,268
Maintenance
Other funds SB 5541 2(2) -916,078
Project Delivery and
Support
Other funds SB 5541 2(3) +324,893
Local Government Program
Other funds SB 5541 2(5) +1,855
Driver and Motor Vehicle
Services
Other funds SB 5541 2(6) +181,397
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 47
Federal funds SB 5541 3(1) +3,329
Towing Board
Other funds SB 5541 2(7) +4,478
Commerce and Compliance
Other funds SB 5541 2(8) +37,111
Policy, Data and Analysis
Other funds SB 5541 2(9) +34,345
Public Transportation
Other funds SB 5541 2(10) +126,703
Federal funds SB 5541 3(4) +167,505
Administrative Services
Other funds SB 5541 2(11) -6,167,359
Finance and Budget
Other funds SB 5541 2(12) +2,948,808
SECTION 225. This 2025 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 48